Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB408.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 11 of this Act:
(1) "Adult" means a person who is eighteen (18) years of age or older;
(2) "Advanced practice registered nurse" has the same meaning as in KRS 314.011
(3) "Attending provider" means the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or
physician assistant licensed in Kentucky who has primary responsibility for the
treatment and care of the patient's terminal disease;
(4) "Consulting provider" means a physician, advanced practice registered nurse,
physician assistant licensed in Kentucky who is qualified by specialty or
experience to make a professional diagnosis and prognosis regarding a patient's
terminal disease;
(5) "Counseling" means one (1) or more consultations between a state-licensed
psychiatrist, psychologist, clinical social worker, or clinical professional
counselor and a patient for the purpose of determining that the patient is
mentally capable and not experiencing impaired judgment;
(6) "Health care facility" means a hospital, nursing facility, nursing home, or
hospice, public or private, whether organized for profit or not, that is licensed
pursuant to KRS Chapter 216B;
(7) "Health care provider" means a health care facility or a health care provider
licensed under KRS Chapter 311, 314, 315, 319, or 335;
(8) "Informed decision" means a decision by a qualified patient to request and
obtain a prescription for medication that the qualified patient may self-administer
to end the qualified patient's life in a humane and dignified manner that is based
on an appreciation of the relevant facts and that is made after being fully
Page 1 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 231
informed by the attending provider of the:
(a) Qualified patient's medical diagnosis;
(b) Qualified patient's prognosis;
(c) Potential risks associated with taking the medication to be prescribed;
(d) Probable result of taking the medication to be prescribed; and
(e) Feasible alternatives to taking the medication to be prescribed, including
palliative care, comfort care, hospice care, pain control, and terminal
disease-directed treatment options;
(9) "Medically confirmed" means the medical opinion of an attending provider has
been confirmed by a consulting provider who has examined the patient and the
patient's relevant medical records;
(10) "Mentally capable" means that, in the opinion of the patient's attending provider,
consulting provider, psychiatrist, psychologist, clinical social worker, or clinical
professional counselor, a patient has the ability to make and communicate an
informed decision to health care providers, including communication through
persons familiar with the patient's manner of communicating if those persons are
available;
(11) "Notice" means a separate statement in writing advising of a health care
provider's policy with respect to prohibiting participation in activities under
Sections 1 to 11 of this Act;
(12) "Participating, or entering into an agreement to participate, in activities" means
doing or entering into an agreement to:
(a) Perform the duties of a health care provider under Sections 1 to 11 of this
Act;
(b) Deliver the prescription for or dispensing or delivering the dispensed
medication pursuant to Sections 1 to 11 of this Act; or
(c) Be present when the qualified patient takes the medication prescribed
Page 2 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 231
pursuant to Sections 1 to 11 of this Act;
(13) "Patient" means an adult who is under the care of an attending provider;
(14) "Physician" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.550;
(15) "Physician assistant" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.840;
(16) "Qualified patient" means a mentally capable adult who has satisfied the
requirements of Sections 1 to 11 of this Act in order to obtain a prescription for
medication that the qualified patient may self-administer to end the qualified
patient's life in a humane and dignified manner;
(17) "Self-administer":
(a) Means, for a qualified patient, to voluntarily ingest medication to end the
qualified patient's life in a humane and dignified manner; and
(b) Does not include administration by parenteral injection or infusion; and
(18) "Terminal disease" means an incurable and irreversible disease that has been
medically confirmed and will, within reasonable medical judgment, result in
death within six (6) months.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A patient has a right to information regarding all treatment options reasonably
available for the care of the patient, including but not limited to information in
response to specific questions about the foreseeable risks and benefits of
medication, without an attending provider's withholding requested information
regardless of the purpose of the questions or the nature of the information.
(2) A patient who is mentally capable, is a resident of Kentucky, has been determined
by an attending provider and a consulting provider to be suffering from a
terminal disease, and has voluntarily expressed the wish to die may make a
written request for medication that the patient may self-administer in accordance
with Sections 1 to 11 of this Act. A patient shall not qualify under Sections 1 to 11
Page 3 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 231
of this Act solely because of age or disability.
(3) A valid written request for medication under Sections 1 to 11 of this Act shall be
substantially in the form described in Section 8 of this Act, signed and dated by
the patient and witnessed by at least two (2) individuals who, in the presence of
the patient, attest that to the best of their knowledge and belief the patient is
mentally capable, acting voluntarily, and not being coerced to sign the request.
(4) The language of a written request for medication under Sections 1 to 11 of this
Act shall be the language in which any conversations or consultations or
interpreted conversations or consultations between a patient and the patient's
attending provider or consulting provider are held.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section, the language of a written request
for medication under Sections 1 to 11 of this Act may be in English when the
conversations or consultations or interpreted conversations or consultations
between a patient and the patient's attending provider or consulting provider were
conducted in a language other than English, if the form described in Section 8 of
this Act contains the attachment described in Section 9 of this Act.
(6) At least one (1) of the witnesses and the interpreter, if an interpreter is required,
shall be a person who is not:
(a) A relative of the patient by blood, marriage, or adoption;
(b) A person who at the time the request is signed would be entitled to any
portion of the estate of the qualified patient upon death under any will or
state law; or
(c) An owner, operator, or employee of a health care facility where the
qualified patient is receiving medical treatment or is a resident.
(7) The patient's attending provider at the time the written request is signed shall not
be a witness.
(8) If the patient is a patient in a long-term care facility at the time the patient makes
Page 4 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 231
the written request, one (1) of the witnesses shall be a medical director of the
facility.
(9) A patient may rescind a request for medication prescribed under Sections 1 to 11
of this Act at any time and in any manner without regard to the patient's mental
state.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any state law to the contrary, an attending provider may provide
medication to a qualified patient to end the qualified patient's life upon a request
made by the qualified patient under Sections 1 to 11 of this Act.
(2) The attending provider shall:
(a) Make the initial determination of whether a patient has a terminal disease,
is mentally capable, and has made the written request for medication that
the patient may self-administer voluntarily;
(b) Inform the patient of:
1. The patient's medical diagnosis;
2. The patient's prognosis;
3. The potential risks associated with taking the medication to be
prescribed;
4. The probable result of taking the medication to be prescribed; and
5. The feasible alternatives to taking the medication to be prescribed,
including palliative care, comfort care, hospice care, pain control, and
terminal disease-directed treatment options;
(c) Refer the patient to a consulting provider for medical confirmation of the
diagnosis and for a determination that the patient is mentally capable and
acting voluntarily;
(d) Confirm that the patient's request does not arise from coercion or undue
Page 5 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 231
influence by another individual by discussing with the patient, outside the
presence of any other individual except for an interpreter, whether the
patient is feeling coerced or unduly influenced;
(e) Refer the patient for counseling, if appropriate, as described in subsection
(4) of this section;
(f) Recommend that the patient notify the patient's next of kin;
(g) Counsel the patient about the importance of having another person present
when the patient takes the medication prescribed under Sections 1 to 11 of
this Act, and counsel the patient about not taking the medication prescribed
in a public place;
(h) Inform the patient that the patient has an opportunity to rescind the request
at any time and in any manner and offer the patient an opportunity to
rescind the request pursuant to subsection (6) of this section;
(i) Verify, immediately before writing the prescription for medication under
Sections 1 to 11 of this Act, that the patient is making an informed decision;
(j) Fulfill the medical record documentation requirements of subsection (7) of
this section;
(k) Ensure that all appropriate steps are carried out in accordance with
Sections 1 to 11 of this Act before writing a prescription for medication to
enable a qualified patient to end the qualified patient's life in a humane and
dignified manner; and
(l) Dispense medications directly, including ancillary medications intended to
minimize the patient's discomfort, if appropriate, or with the patient's
written consent:
1. Contact a pharmacist and inform the pharmacist of the prescription;
and
2. Deliver the written prescription personally, by mail, or electronically to
Page 6 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 231
the pharmacist, who may dispense the medications in person to the
patient, the attending provider, or an expressly identified agent of the
patient.
(3) Before a patient is determined to be a qualified patient under Sections 1 to 11 of
this Act, a consulting provider shall examine the patient and the patient's relevant
medical records and confirm, in writing, the attending provider's diagnosis that
the patient is suffering from a terminal disease and that the patient is mentally
capable, is acting voluntarily, and has made an informed decision.
(4) If, in the opinion of the attending provider or the consulting provider, a patient
may be suffering from a psychiatric or psychological disorder or depression
causing impaired judgment, the attending provider shall refer the patient for
counseling. Medication for the qualified patient to self-administer shall not be
prescribed until the person performing the counseling determines that the patient
is not experiencing impaired judgment.
(5) An attending provider shall not deny medication to self-administer to a qualified
patient who declines or is unable to notify the qualifying patient's next of kin.
(6) An attending provider shall not prescribe medication to a qualified patient to self-
administer unless the qualified patient has:
(a) Made an oral request;
(b) Made and signed a written request at least fifteen (15) days after the initial
oral request;
(c) Reiterated the oral request at least fifteen (15) days after making the initial
oral request; and
(d) Been offered an opportunity to rescind a request by the attending provider
at least forty-eight (48) hours after signing the written request.
(7) An attending provider shall document in a patient's medical record:
(a) All oral requests by the patient for medication;
Page 7 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 231
(b) All written requests by the patient for medication;
(c) The attending provider's diagnosis and prognosis and the attending
provider's determination that the patient is mentally capable, is acting
voluntarily, and has made an informed decision;
(d) The consulting provider's diagnosis and prognosis of the patient's terminal
disease and the consulting provider's verification that the patient is mentally
capable, is acting voluntarily, and has made an informed decision;
(e) A report of the outcome and determinations made during counseling, if
counseling is provided as described in subsection (4) of this section;
(f) The attending provider's offer to the patient to rescind the patient's request
at the time of the patient's second oral request; and
(g) A note by the attending provider indicating that all requirements under
Sections 1 to 11 of this Act have been met and indicating the steps taken to
carry out the patient's request, including a notation of the medication
prescribed for self-administration.
(8) A person who has custody of or control over any unused medications prescribed
pursuant to Sections 1 to 11 of this Act after the death of the qualified patient
shall personally deliver the unused medications to the nearest facility qualified to
dispose of controlled substances or, if such delivery is impracticable, personally
dispose of the unused medications by any lawful means.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall:
(a) Annually review all records maintained under Section 3 of this Act and
collected pursuant to this section; and
(b) Require an attending provider to submit a copy of the prescription or
dispensing record upon issuing a prescription or dispensing medication
Page 8 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 231
under Section 3 of this Act, and other documentation required under
Section 3 of this Act associated with issuing the prescription or dispensing
the medication, to the cabinet within:
1. Thirty (30) calendar days after the issuance of the prescription or the
dispensing of medication; or
2. Thirty (30) calendar days after the date of the death of the qualified
patient.
(2) In the event that an attending provider who is required to report information to
the cabinet provides an inadequate or incomplete report, the cabinet shall contact
the attending provider to request an adequate or complete report.
(3) Within six (6) months of the effective date of this Act, the cabinet shall
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
facilitate the collection of information relating to compliance with Sections 1 to
11 this Act. The information collected on individual persons and health care
providers shall be confidential, not a public record, and shall not be made
available for inspection by the public.
(4) The cabinet shall submit an annual report summarizing information collected
under this section to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the
Interim Joint Committee on Health Services by March 1 of each year. The report
shall not refer to actions taken under Sections 1 to 11 of this Act as suicide or
assisted suicide. Consistent with the provisions of Sections 1 to 11 of this Act, the
report shall refer to actions taken under Sections 1 to 11 of this Act as obtaining
and self-administering life-ending medication.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any provision in a contract, will, or other agreement, whether written or oral, to
the extent the provision would affect whether a person may make or rescind a
Page 9 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 231
request for medication to self-administer to end the person's life in a humane and
dignified manner, shall be void as against public policy. Any obligation owing
under any currently existing contract shall not be conditioned upon or affected by
the making or rescinding of a request by a person for medication to end the
person's life in a humane and dignified manner.
(2) The sale, procurement, or issuance of any life, health, or accident insurance or
annuity policy or the rate charged for any life, health, or accident insurance or
annuity policy shall not be conditioned upon or affected by the making or
rescinding of a request by a qualified patient for medication that the patient may
self-administer to end the patient's life in accordance with Sections 1 to 11 of this
Act.
(3) A qualified patient whose life is insured under a life insurance policy and the
beneficiaries of the policy shall not be denied benefits on the basis of self-
administration of medication by the qualified patient in accordance with Sections
1 to 11 of this Act.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Nothing in Sections 1 to 11 of this Act shall require a health care provider to
provide medication to a qualified patient to end the qualified patient's life. If a
health care provider is unable or unwilling to carry out the qualified patient's
request under Sections 1 to 11 of this Act, the health care provider shall transfer
any relevant medical records for the patient to a new health care provider upon
request by the patient.
(2) (a) A health care provider may adopt a policy to prohibit a person or entity
from participating, or entering into an agreement to participate, in activities
under Sections 1 to 11 of this Act while on premises owned, under
management, or under direct control of that health care provider or while
Page 10 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 231
acting within the course and scope of any employment by, or contract with,
the health care provider.
(b) A health care provider that adopts a policy described in paragraph (a) of
this subsection shall give notice of the policy prohibiting participation to a
person or entity prior to that person or entity participating in activities
under Sections 1 to 11 of this Act. A health care provider that fails to
provide notice to a person or entity shall not enforce the policy against a
person or entity.
(c) A health care provider shall not report an action taken pursuant to this
subsection to a state licensing board.
(3) A health care provider shall not prohibit a person or entity from participating, or
entering into an agreement to participate, in activities under Sections 1 to 11 of
this Act while on premises that are not owned or under the management or direct
control of the health care provider or while acting outside the course and scope of
the participant's duties as an employee of, or an independent contractor for, the
health care provider.
(4) The fact that a health care provider participates in activities under Sections 1 to
11 of this Act shall not be the sole basis for a complaint or report by another
health care provider to a state licensing board.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Nothing in Sections 1 to 11 of this Act shall authorize a health care provider or
any other person to end a patient's life by lethal injection, mercy killing, or active
euthanasia.
(2) Actions taken by any person or entity in participating in activities, including
acting as a witness or interpreter under Sections 1 to 11 of this Act, shall not for
any purpose constitute suicide, assisted suicide, mercy killing, or homicide under
Page 11 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 231
state law.
(3) The cause of death recorded on a certificate of death under KRS 213.076 for the
death of a qualified patient under Sections 1 to 11 of this Act shall be related to
the terminal disease of the qualifying patient and shall not be recorded as suicide,
assisted suicide, mercy killing, or homicide under state law.
(4) Actions taken in good faith by any person, health facility, or facility that provides
counseling in accordance with Sections 1 to 11 of this Act shall not be subject to
criminal or civil liability, licensing sanctions, or other professional disciplinary
action.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A request for medication as authorized by Sections 1 to 11 of this Act shall be in
substantially the following form:
"REQUEST FOR MEDICATION TO END MY LIFE IN A HUMANE AND
DIGNIFIED MANNER
I, ......................., am an adult of sound mind. I am suffering from ................................,
which my attending provider has determined is a terminal disease and which has been
medically confirmed by a consulting provider.
I have been fully informed of my diagnosis and prognosis, the nature of medication to
be prescribed and potential associated risks, the expected result and feasible
alternatives, including palliative care and comfort care, hospice care, pain control, and
terminal disease-directed treatment options.
I request that my attending provider prescribe medication that I may self-administer to
end my life in a humane and dignified manner and contact any pharmacist to fill the
prescription.
INITIAL ONE:
..........I have informed my family of my decision and taken their opinions into
Page 12 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 231
consideration.
..........I have decided not to inform my family of my decision.
..........I have no family to inform of my decision.
I understand that I have the right to rescind this request at any time.
I understand the full import of this request, and I expect to die when I take the
medication to be prescribed. I further understand that, although most deaths occur
within 3 hours, my death may take longer and my attending provider has counseled me
about this possibility.
I make this request voluntarily and without reservation, and I accept full moral
responsibility for my actions.
Signed:....................................................
Dated:......................................................
DECLARATION OF WITNESSES
By initialing and signing below on or after the date the person named above signs, we
declare that the person making and signing the above request:
Initials of Witness 1:
..........1. Is personally known to us or has provided proof of identity;
..........2. Signed this request in our presence on the date of the person's signature;
..........3. Appears to be of sound mind and not under duress, fraud, or undue influence;
and
..........4. Is not a patient for whom either of us is the attending provider.
Printed Name of Witness 1:................................................
Signature of Witness 1/Date:............................................
Initials of Witness 2:
..........1. Is personally known to us or has provided proof of identity;
..........2. Signed this request in our presence on the date of the person's signature;
..........3. Appears to be of sound mind and not under duress, fraud, or undue influence;
Page 13 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 231
and
..........4. Is not a patient for whom either of us is the attending provider.
Printed Name of Witness 2:................................................
Signature of Witness 2/Date:.............................................
NOTE: One witness must be a person who is not a relative by blood, marriage, or
adoption of the person signing this request, is not entitled to any portion of the person's
estate upon death, and does not own or operate or is not employed at a health care
facility where the person is a patient or resident. The person's attending provider at the
time the request is signed may not be a witness. If the person is an inpatient at a long-
term care facility, one of the witnesses must be the medical director of the facility."
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The form of an attachment for purposes of an interpreter providing services as
described in Section 2 of this Act shall be in substantially the following form:
"I, .........................., am fluent in English and (language of patient).
On (date) at approximately (time) I read the "REQUEST FOR MEDICATION TO
END MY LIFE IN A HUMANE AND DIGNIFIED MANNER" to (name of patient)
in (language of patient).
Mr./Ms. (name of patient) affirmed to me that he/she understands the content of this
form, that he/she desires to sign this form under his/her own power and volition and
that he/she requested to sign the form after consultations with an attending provider
and a consulting provider.
Under penalty of perjury, I declare that I am fluent in English and (language of
patient) and that the contents of this form, to the best of my knowledge, are true and
correct.
Executed at (name of city, county and state) on (date).
Interpreter's signature: ..................................
Page 14 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 231
Interpreter's printed name: ............................
Interpreter's address: .....................................".
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person commits a Class B felony if the person knowingly or intentionally
causes an individual's death by:
(a) Forging or altering a request for medication pursuant to Sections 1 to 11 of
this Act; or
(b) Concealing or destroying a rescission of a request for medication pursuant
to Sections 1 to 11 of this Act.
(2) A person commits a Class B felony if the person knowingly or intentionally
coerces or exerts undue influence on an individual with a terminal illness to
request or utilize medication pursuant to Sections 1 to 11 of this Act.
(3) Nothing in Sections 1 to 11 of this Act limits civil liability for civil damages from
other negligent conduct or intentional misconduct by any health care facility or
health care provider.
(4) The penalties specified in Sections 1 to 11 of this Act do not preclude criminal
penalties applicable under the Kentucky Penal Code for conduct that is
inconsistent with Sections 1 to 11 of this Act.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
If any provision of Sections 1 to 11 of this Act or the application thereof to any person
or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable.
SECTION 12. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 12 OF KRS CHAPTER 304
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 15 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 231
To the extent allowed by law, no insurer shall:
(1) Issue or renew an insurance policy, contract, or annuity that violates the
provisions of Section 5 of this Act; or
(2) Deny benefits on the basis of terms in an existing policy, contract, or annuity that
are in violation of the provisions of Section 5 of this Act.
Section 13. KRS 507.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of murder when:
(a) With intent to cause the death of another person, he or she causes the death of
such person or of a third person; except that in any prosecution a person shall
not be guilty under this subsection if he or she acted under the influence of
extreme emotional disturbance for which there was a reasonable explanation
or excuse, the reasonableness of which is to be determined from the viewpoint
of a person in the defendant's situation under the circumstances as the
defendant believed them to be. However, nothing contained in this section
shall constitute a defense to a prosecution for or preclude a conviction of
manslaughter in the first degree or any other crime; or
(b) Including, but not limited to, the operation of a motor vehicle under
circumstances manifesting extreme indifference to human life, he or she
wantonly engages in conduct which creates a grave risk of death to another
person and thereby causes the death of another person.
(2) Murder is a capital offense.
(3) It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge of murder that the person's conduct
was expressly authorized by Sections 1 to 11 of this Act.
Section 14. KRS 507.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of manslaughter in the first degree when:
(a) With intent to cause serious physical injury to another person, he or she
causes the death of such person or of a third person;
Page 16 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 231
(b) With intent to cause the death of another person, he or she causes the death of
such person or of a third person under circumstances which do not constitute
murder because he or she acts under the influence of extreme emotional
disturbance, as defined in subsection (1)(a) of KRS 507.020;
(c) Through circumstances not otherwise constituting the offense of murder, he or
she intentionally abuses another person or knowingly permits another person
of whom he or she has actual custody to be abused and thereby causes death
to a person twelve (12) years of age or less, or who is physically helpless or
mentally helpless; or
(d) He or she knowingly sells fentanyl or a fentanyl derivative to another person,
and the injection, ingestion, inhalation, or other introduction of the fentanyl or
fentanyl derivative causes the death of the person.
(2) Manslaughter in the first degree is a Class B felony.
(3) It shall be an affirmative defense to a charge of manslaughter in the first degree
that the person's conduct was expressly authorized by Sections 1 to 11 of this Act.
Section 15. Sections 1 to 11 of this Act may be cited as Rena's Law.
Page 17 of 17
XXXX 1/14/2026 12:09 PM Jacketed